Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 75.
[ENVIRONMENTAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS].

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1007 during the 1995 Regular Session and adopted at the general election on November 5, 1996, by a vote of 405,216 for and 396,932 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 75, § 5: collection of the tax imposed by this amendment began on July 1, 1997.

§ 1. Statement of purpose.

The people of the State of Arkansas find that fish, wildlife, parks, tourism and natural heritage constitute a major economic and natural resource of the state and they desire to provide additional funds to the Arkansas Game and Fish Commission, the Department of Parks and Tourism, the Department of Heritage and Keep Arkansas Beautiful.

§ 2. [Excise tax levied]

There is hereby levied an additional excise tax of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) upon all taxable sales of property and services subject to the tax levied by the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act (Arkansas Code § 26-52-101 et seq.), and such tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection, reporting and payment of all other Arkansas gross receipts taxes.

There is hereby levied an additional excise tax of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) upon all tangible personal property subject to the tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act (Arkansas Code § 26-53-101 et seq.), and such tax shall be collected, reported, and paid in the same manner and at the same time as is prescribed by law for the collection, reporting and payment of Arkansas compensating taxes.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed section heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 3. Use of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any provision of Amendment 35 or any other provision of the Arkansas Constitution to the contrary, forty-five percent (45%) of all monies collected from the tax levied herein shall be deposited in the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Game Protection Fund to be used exclusively by the Arkansas Game and Fish Commission, as appropriated by the General Assembly.

Forty-five percent (45%) of all monies collected from the tax levied herein shall be deposited in the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Department of Parks and Tourism Fund Account to be used by the Department of Parks and Tourism for state park purposes, as appropriated by the General Assembly.

Nine percent (9%) of all monies collected from the tax levied herein shall be deposited in the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Arkansas Department of Heritage Fund Account to be used exclusively by the Department of Heritage as appropriated by the General Assembly.

One percent (1%) of all monies collected from the tax levied herein shall be deposited in the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Fund Account, which is hereby created on the books of the State Treasurer, State Auditor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to be used exclusively by Keep Arkansas Beautiful, as appropriated by the General Assembly.

§ 4. [Administrative procedures]

The General Assembly shall provide for the proper administration and enforcement of this amendment by law.

Unless the General Assembly provides another procedure by law, the provisions of the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, Sections 26-18-101 et seq., shall so far as practicable be applicable to the tax levied by this amendment and the reporting, remitting and enforcement of the tax.

(i) The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” shall not appear adjacent to the names of candidates for Congress if the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in subsection (e) is before the states for ratification or has become a part of the United States Constitution.

A non-incumbent candidate for the office of United States Representative, United States Senator, State Representative, or State Senator, shall be permitted to sign a “Term Limits Pledge” each time the non-incumbent files as a candidate for such an office. A candidate who declines to sign the “Term Limits Pledge” shall have “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to the candidate's name on the election ballot;

Each time a non-incumbent candidate for United States Senator, United States Representative, State Senator, or State Representative files for candidacy for those offices, the candidate shall be offered the “Term Limits Pledge” until the United States Constitution has been amended to limit United States Senators to two terms in office and United States Representative to three terms in office;

The “Term Limits Pledge” that each non-incumbent candidate for state and federal legislative offices shall be offered is as follows:

Failed to vote in favor of the application set forth in subsection (k) above when brought to a vote; or

Failed to second the application set forth in subsection (k) above if it lacked a second; or

Failed to vote in favor of all votes bringing the application set forth in subsection (k) above before any committee or subcommittee upon which the legislator served; or

Failed to propose or otherwise bring to a vote of the full legislative body the application set forth in subsection (k) if it otherwise lacked a legislator who so proposed or brought to a vote of the full legislative body the application set forth above; or

Failed to vote against any attempt to delay, table, or otherwise prevent a vote by the full legislative body on the application set forth in subsection (k) above; or

Failed in any way to ensure that all votes on the application set forth in subsection (k) were recorded and made available to the public; or

Failed to vote against any change, addition, or modification to the application set forth in subsection (k) above; or

Failed to attend a hearing, session, or vote of the legislative body concerning any aspect of consideration of the proposals in subsection (e) and subsection (k) above, where such failure to attend resulted in any failure to obtain a quorum sufficient to conduct business; or

Failed to move for, second, or vote in favor of a roll-call vote on any aspect of consideration of the proposals in subsection (e) and subsection (k) above, where such failure resulted in the defeat of any aspect of subsection (e) and subsection (k) above, without recording the votes of individual legislators to be held accountable at a later time.

Failed to vote against any effort to rescind the application.

Failed to vote in favor of the amendment set forth in subsection (e) above, when the amendment was sent to the states for ratification; or

Failed to vote against any term limits amendment with terms longer than the limits set forth in the proposed amendment in subsection (e) above, when such an amendment is ssent [sic] to the states for ratification.

The Secretary of State, in accordance with subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection shall determine and declare what information, if any, shall appear adjacent to the names of each incumbent state and federal legislator if the incumbent were to be a candidate in the next general election and shall certify such information to the appropriate county clerks and other appropriate voting officials.

The Secretary of State shall determine, declare, and certify what information, if any, shall appear adjacent to the names of non-incumbent candidates for state and federal legislator, not later than five (5) business days after the deadline for filing for the office. The Secretary of State shall provide official notification to the candidate by certified mail and to the public by official media statement and legal publication in a newspaper of statewide circulation at least two separate times prior to the election, in accordance with the time frames set forth herein.

If the Secretary of State makes the determination that the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” OR “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” shall not be certified for placement on the ballot adjacent to the name of a candidate for senator or representative for state or federal office, any candidate or elector may appeal such decision to the Arkansas Supreme Court as an original action within five (5) business days after the second official newspaper publication of the determination by the Secretary of State or shall waive any right to appeal such decision. The burden of proof shall be upon the Secretary of State to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the candidate has met the requirements set forth in this act and therefore should not have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed on the ballot adjacent to the candidate's name.

If the Secretary of State determines that the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” OR “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” shall be certified for placement on the ballot adjacent to a candidate's name for a senator or representative for state or federal office, the candidate may appeal such decision to the Arkansas Supreme Court as an original action within five (5) business days after receipt of notification or shall waive any right to appeal such decision. The burden of proof shall be upon the candidate to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the candidate should not have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” printed on the ballot adjacent to the candidate's name.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed section heading was added by the Publisher.

Cross References.

Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.